Hawaii statutes.
§431:30-107 Management committee; officers
and personnel. (a) A management committee comprising no more than
fourteen members shall be established as follows:

(1) One member from each of the six compacting states
with the largest premium volume for individual and group annuities, life,
disability income, and long-term care insurance products, determined from the
records of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for the prior
year;

(2) Four members from compacting states with at least
two per cent of the market based on the premium volume described above, other
than the six compacting states with the largest premium volume, selected on a
rotating basis as provided in the bylaws; and

(3) Four members from those compacting states with
less than two per cent of the market, based on the premium volume described
above, with one selected from each of the four zone regions of the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners as provided in the bylaws.

(b) The management committee shall have the
authority and duties set forth in the bylaws, including but not limited to:

(1) Managing the affairs of the commission in a
manner consistent with the bylaws and purposes of the commission;

(2) Establishing and overseeing an organizational
structure within, and appropriate procedures for, the commission to provide for
the creation of uniform standards and other rules, receipt and review of
product filings, administrative and technical support functions, review of
decisions regarding the disapproval of a product filing, and the review of
elections made by a compacting state to opt out of a uniform standard; provided
that a uniform standard shall not be submitted to the compacting states for
adoption unless approved by two-thirds of the members of the management
committee;

(3) Overseeing the offices of the commission; and

(4) Planning, implementing, and coordinating
communications and activities with other state, federal, and local government
organizations to advance the goals of the commission.

(c) The commission shall annually elect
officers from the management committee with each having such authority and
duties as may be specified in the bylaws.

(d) The management committee, subject to the
approval of the commission, may appoint or retain an executive director for
such period, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as the
commission may deem appropriate. The executive director shall serve as
secretary to the commission, but shall not be a member of the commission. The
executive director shall hire and supervise such other staff as may be
authorized by the commission. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 132, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next